California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

48432.3.

(a) If the governing board of a school district chooses to voluntarily enroll high school pupils in a continuation school, the governing board of the school district shall establish and adopt policies and procedures governing the identification, placement, and intake procedures for these pupils. These policies and procedures shall ensure that there is a clear criterion for determining which pupils may voluntarily transfer or be recommended for a transfer to a continuation school and that this criterion is not applied arbitrarily, but is consistently applied on a districtwide basis. Approval for the voluntary transfer of a pupil to a
 continuation school shall be based on a finding that the voluntary placement will promote the educational interests of the pupil.

(b) The policies and procedures adopted under this section shall also ensure all of the following: 

(1) That voluntary placement in a continuation school shall not be used as an alternative to expulsion unless alternative means of correction have been attempted pursuant to Section 48900.5.

(2) Shall strive to ensure that no specific group of pupils, including a group based on race, ethnicity, language status, or special needs, is disproportionately enrolled in continuation schools within the school district.

(3) If the governing
 board of a school district chooses to permit pupils to voluntarily transfer to a continuation school, a copy of the policies and procedures adopted under this section shall be provided to a pupil whose voluntary transfer to a continuation school is under consideration, and to the parent or legal guardian of that pupil.

(4) That the transfer is voluntary and the pupil has a right to return to his or her previous school.

(5) Upon a parent or legal guardian’s request and before a pupil is transferred, the parent or legal guardian may meet with a counselor, principal, or administrator from both the transferor school and the continuation school to determine if transferring is the best option for the pupil.

(6) To the extent possible, voluntary transfer to a continuation school occurs within the first four weeks of each semester.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   (AB 570)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

48432.5.

(a) The governing board of each high school or unified school district that assigns pupils to continuation schools shall adopt rules and regulations governing procedures for the involuntary transfer of pupils to continuation schools.

(b) The rules and regulations shall provide that written notice be given to the pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian or, if the pupil is a foster child, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker, or, if the pupil is an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker informing them of the opportunity to request a meeting with a designee of the district superintendent of schools
 before the transfer.

(c) At the meeting, the pupil, the pupil’s parent or guardian, or, if applicable, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker, or, if applicable, the Indian child’s tribal social worker or, if applicable, county social worker shall be informed of the specific facts and reasons for the proposed transfer and shall have the opportunity to inspect all documents relied upon, question any evidence and witnesses presented, and present evidence on the pupil’s behalf. The pupil may designate one or more representatives and witnesses to be present with the pupil at the meeting.

(d) A decision to transfer the pupil involuntarily shall be based on a finding that the pupil committed an act enumerated in Section 48900, or has been habitually truant or irregular in attendance from instruction upon which the pupil is lawfully required to
 attend.

(e) The decision to transfer shall be in writing, stating the facts and reasons for the decision, and sent to the pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian or, if applicable, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker, or, if applicable, the Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker. It shall indicate whether the decision is subject to periodic review and the periodic review procedure.

(f) The persons involved in the final decision to make an involuntary transfer of a pupil to a continuation school shall not be a member of the staff of the school in which the pupil is enrolled at the time that the decision is made.

(g) A pupil, with the concurrence of a designee of the district superintendent of schools, may transfer voluntarily to a
 continuation school in order to receive special attention such as individualized instruction.

(h) Involuntary transfer to a continuation school shall be imposed only when other means fail to bring about pupil improvement; provided that a pupil may be involuntarily transferred the first time the pupil commits an act enumerated in Section 48900 if the principal determines that the pupil’s presence causes a danger to persons or property or threatens to disrupt the instructional process.

(i) An involuntary transfer to a continuation school shall not extend beyond the end of the semester following the semester during which the acts leading directly to the involuntary transfer occurred unless the governing board of the school district adopts a procedure for yearly review of the involuntary transfer conducted pursuant to this section at the request of the pupil, the pupil’s parent or
 guardian, or, if applicable, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, or county social worker, or, if applicable, the Indian child’s tribal social worker or, if applicable, county social worker.

(j) A pupil who has voluntarily transferred to a continuation school shall have the right to return to the regular high school at the beginning of the following school year and, with the consent of a designee of the district superintendent of schools, may return at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 36.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

48433.

Special continuation education classes or classes conducted by a regional occupational center or any combination thereof shall provide at least four 60-minute hours of instruction per week for each minor within the high school district who is subject to compulsory continuation education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48434.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), such classes shall be maintained during the district’s regular school hours, or during special school hours for these classes established by the governing board.

(b) If the school district maintains classes for adults, the governing board of the school district may maintain continuation education classes during such hours and for such length of time during the day or evening as the classes for adults are maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

48435.

Such classes shall provide suitable instruction for the various individuals for whose benefit they are established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48436.

The State Board of Education shall prescribe and enforce standards and regulations for the organization and administration of programs of guidance, placement and followup, for programs of coordination and instruction in continuation education, for the special reimbursement thereof, and for the certification of teachers and coordinators for continuation education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48437.

The governing board of a school district or school districts, as the case may be, maintaining special continuation education classes may accept and expend grants from the federal government or from other public or private sources for the purpose of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48438.

It is the intent of the Legislature that special funds for eligible pupils be expended by the continuation schools in which those pupils are enrolled.

State and federal categorical funds shall be allocated to continuation schools in the same manner as to comprehensive schools to the maximum extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 87.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Violations [48450. - 48454.]

48450.

Each parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of any minor required to attend special continuation education classes, shall compel the attendance of the minor upon the classes. He shall retain a copy of the permit to work and shall present it upon request of any officer of the law, or other person authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48451.

The governing board of any high school district in which a minor resides who violates the provisions of this chapter shall, on the complaint of any person, make full and impartial investigation of all charges against any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor for violation of the provisions of Section 48450.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48452.

If it appears upon the investigation that any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor has violated the provisions of Section 48450, the clerk of the board, or other person authorized by the board to bring such actions, shall make and file in the proper court a criminal complaint against the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor, charging the violation, and shall see that the charge is prosecuted by the proper authorities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48453.

In cities, and in cities and counties, and in school districts having an attendance supervisor, the attendance supervisor shall make and file the complaint provided for in this article, and shall see that the charge is prosecuted by the proper authorities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48454.

Any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of any minor subject to this chapter who fails to perform any of the duties imposed upon him by the provisions of Section 48450 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than five days.

(2) Upon a second or subsequent conviction, by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) or more than five hundred dollars ($500), by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not less than five days or more than 25 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 86.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Attendance at Adjustment Schools [48600. - 48666.]



  ARTICLE 1. Twenty-four Hour Elementary Schools [48600. - 48618.]

48600.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide for the operation of 24-hour elementary schools, established pursuant to Article 27 (commencing with Section 940) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for minors between the ages of 8 and 16 years and to provide for the attendance, maintenance, care, home supervision, guidance, observation, and education of minors attending the schools, and to provide the minors with that vocational, family and consumer sciences, mental, moral, physical, and other training that will tend to strengthen and develop them and enable them to become good and useful citizens. The staff of every 24-hour school shall make adjustments as rapidly as possible so that the period of time the child is away from ordinary community life is as brief as possible. They shall place
 the minors in properly licensed children’s institutions where they will be assured of suitable educational opportunities, and shall cooperate with child placement agencies to this end and to stimulate proper care of the minors by their parents.

(b) For purposes of this article, the county superintendent of schools has the primary authority to provide for the education and training of minors in 24-hour schools within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 78.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

48601.

This article shall be construed in conformity with the intent as well as the express provisions thereof and shall confer upon the county probation officer, and the county superintendent or governing board, as the case may be, of any 24-hour school that may be created authority to do all those lawful acts which it may deem necessary to promote the prosperity of the school, or to promote the well-being and education of all minors entrusted to its charge.

(History: Enacted to Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48602.

The county superintendent of schools or the governing board of the district, as the case may be, which shall have, in reference to 24-hour schools, the same powers and duties which are now or may hereafter be assigned by law for the management of other schools. A 24-hour school established by a school district maintaining elementary schools shall be one of the public elementary schools of the district. The average daily attendance of each such school shall be reported to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for purposes of allowances and apportionments from the State School Fund in the manner otherwise prescribed by and pursuant to law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48603.

The cost of securing sites or constructing and equipping buildings and in general the cost of housing and equipping any 24-hour school, including the necessary dormitories, dining halls, and other living quarters for pupils and employees of the county or the district shall be a charge against the funds of the county or school district maintaining it. The county superintendent or governing board of any district, as the case may be, may employ such principals, assistants, teachers, and employees as it deems necessary for the proper conduct of the 24-hour school and may pay them from available funds. The expenses of lodging and boarding pupils residing within the buildings of any 24-hour school shall be paid from the sums received from contracts with the parents or guardians of the pupils, or from the funds of the county within which the school is located paid to the school district, if applicable, in pursuance of court orders for the maintenance of pupils.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48604.

The superintendent appointed pursuant to Section 942 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may reside in the 24-hour school and may be furnished suitable quarters, furniture, food, supplies, and laundry for himself and his family. The county superintendent or governing board of the district, as the case may be, may make provision for the employment of such certificated personnel, including a principal, and such classified personnel at such school as may be necessary for the education and training of the minors enrolled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48605.

Admission and discharge of minors with behavioral disorders to programs provided under the provisions of this article shall be made only on the basis of an individual evaluation according to standards established by the State Board of Education and upon the recommendation of an admissions committee which shall include a teacher, a psychologist, a school nurse or social worker, a principal or supervisor, an attendance supervisor, a licensed physician, a representative of the probation department and a representative of the social welfare department of the county in which the 24-hour school is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48606.

The board of admission, or some person or persons designated by it, shall investigate the case of any child whose name is submitted in writing accompanied by a signed statement for consideration for admission to the school and shall make recommendations in each case. The board of admission shall observe the progress of each child, and shall advise and recommend his release as soon as sufficient progress is indicated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48607.

The county superintendent or governing board, as the case may be, maintaining a 24-hour school may accept in the school any minor between the ages of 8 and 16 years who is a resident of the county or the school district, as the case may be, whose parent or guardian does not exercise proper care, supervision, and guidance over him, or who is, by reason of insubordinate conduct, or refusal to obey the rules and regulations of the school authorities, in need of special educational training and discipline to prevent him from becoming subject to the provisions of the juvenile court law. The pupil may be assigned to the school by order of the county superintendent or the superintendent of schools of the district, as the case may be, approved in writing by the parent, or guardian in compliance with the recommendation of the board of admission. If the parent or guardian of the pupil enters into a contract with the county or school district, as the case may be, for the support of the pupil, he may be maintained in the school for the period of the assignment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010 (1st text).)
-------------------------------------------

48608.

If the parent or guardian of the pupil refuses to enter into a contract providing for the payment to the county or school district, as the case may be, of a sum sufficient to meet the average cost of maintaining a pupil within the school, including meals and a reasonable sum for lodging, and if the presence of the child within another school of the county or district, as the case may be, or within its home is a menace to the future welfare of other children or of the child itself, the county superintendent or superintendent of schools of the district, as the case may be, shall cause to be filed in the superior court of the county, acting in the department of the court performing the functions of the juvenile court or in any other court of competent jurisdiction, a complaint asking for an order of the court, committing the child to the 24-hour school and fixing the amount the parent or guardian shall pay for his maintenance until such time as the county superintendent or superintendent of schools of the district, as the case may be, reports to the court that the best interests of the minor will be served by his discharge from the school. A copy of the complaint shall at the same time be furnished the parent or guardian. If the parent or guardian is unable to pay the amount, the court may in the order provide for the payment by the county of a sum sufficient to cover the costs of maintenance of the child during the period of his commitment to the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48609.

The principal of any school in the county or district, as the case may be, in which there has been established a 24-hour school shall report to the county superintendent or superintendent of schools of the district, as the case may be, after conference held with the parent or guardian, any pupil in his school who he believes comes within the provisions and intent of this article. This report shall be in writing and shall set forth the facts upon which he believes that the child comes within the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 48607 (2nd text in Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010) by Stats. 1977, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

48610.

Any minor who has been placed in the care and control of the 24-hour school without the consent of the parent or guardian, shall remain therein, if placed by order of the court, for the duration of the period provided by the order, or until recommendation is made by the admissions and discharge committee to the court requesting that consideration be given the minor’s release.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48611.

If the minor has been placed in the 24-hour school by order of the county superintendent or superintendent of schools of the district, as the case may be, the parent or guardian with whose consent the minor was placed in the school, upon application to the county superintendent or superintendent of schools, as the case may be, who placed him therein, may secure the release of the minor and his restoration to the care, custody, and control of the parent or guardian. The county superintendent or superintendent of the district, as the case may be, shall require a written report from the principal of the 24-hour school, giving the progress of the child and the advisability of the release of the child from the 24-hour school. If the report indicates that the minor is in need of further care and treatment and that his release would be detrimental to his own welfare or the welfare of others, the county superintendent or superintendent of the district, as the case may be, may report the minor to the juvenile court or other proper court for action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48612.

If, in the opinion of the principal of any 24-hour school, the further detention of any minor is detrimental to the minor, the minor may upon order of the principal be returned to the county superintendent or superintendent of schools of the district, as the case may be, in which the school is located or to the court which committed him, as may seem necessary for the best interest of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48613.

Any pupil who absents himself from any 24-hour elementary school without permission being first obtained from the principal shall be deemed an habitual truant within the meaning of Section 601 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and dealt with as such.

Any person who contributes to the absence of any pupil from the school without permission first having been obtained from the principal, or advises, connives at, or aids or assists in such absence or conceals any pupil after such absence is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48614.

The course of study for the pupils and the methods used in enforcing the course of study shall be approved by the county superintendent or the governing board of the district, as the case may be. There shall also be provided in the schools the proper facilities and equipment for vocational and trade training.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48615.

Each 24-hour school may conduct clinics for the diagnosis and observation of children and may advise parents and school authorities regarding courses of study or treatment in the interests of the normal development of any child and to prevent waywardness and delinquency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48616.

The funding of the educational vocational program conducted in a 24-hour school shall be in the manner described by Section 41703 when maintained by the county superintendent of schools. Twenty-four-hour schools maintained by the county superintendent shall be considered a necessary small school as defined by Section 41702.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48617.

The county probation officer having management and control of a 24-hour school may enter into a contract with any other county or state agency to provide for the supervision, care and treatment of the minors placed in the 24-hour school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48618.

The enrollment in each 24-hour school shall be limited to the standards established under Section 56615.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Opportunity Schools [48640. - 48641.]

48640.

Opportunity schools established pursuant to this article by the county board of education shall be limited to counties which have an average daily attendance of less than 8,000.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.   Note: The Jan. 1, 2006, article repeal date (in former Section 48642) was made inapplicable to this section by Stats. 2005, Ch. 118, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

48641.

An opportunity school established by a county board of education in a county which has an average daily attendance of less than 8,000 shall be deemed to be in lieu of any continuation education program, and shall excuse the school districts within the county from complying with otherwise applicable statutes requiring the establishment of continuation education schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.   Note: The Jan. 1, 2006, article repeal date (in former Section 48642) was made inapplicable to this section by Stats. 2005, Ch. 118, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Juvenile Court Schools [48645. - 48650.]

48645.

The purpose of this article is to provide for the administration and operation of public schools in juvenile halls, juvenile homes, day centers, juvenile ranches, juvenile camps, regional youth educational facilities, or Orange County youth correctional centers in existence and providing services prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section made by the Statutes of 1989, established pursuant to Article 23 (commencing with Section 850), Article 24 (commencing with Section 880), Article 24.5 (commencing with Section 894) of Chapter 2 of Division 2, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5, of the Welfare and Institutions Code or in any group home housing 25 or more children placed pursuant to Sections 362, 727, and 730, of the Welfare and Institutions Code or in any group home housing 25 or more children and operating one or more additional sites under a central administration for children placed pursuant to Section 362, 727, or 730 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, with acceptable school structures at one or more centrally located sites to serve the single or composite populations, and to provide the juvenile court school pupils therein detained with quality education and training.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as indicating that it is the intent of the Legislature to prevent juvenile court school pupils who are housed in group homes from enrolling in regular public schools, or that it is the intent of the Legislature to transfer the responsibility for any costs associated with the operation of group homes to the counties.

The Orange County Office of Education shall only provide educational services in youth correctional centers for individuals up to 19 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 929, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.1.

Public schools or classes in any juvenile hall, juvenile home, day center, juvenile ranch, juvenile camp, regional youth educational facility, or Orange County youth correctional center in existence and providing services prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section made by the Statutes of 1989, established in accordance with Article 23 (commencing with Section 850), Article 24 (commencing with Section 880), and Article 24.5 (commencing with Section 894) of Chapter 2 of Division 2, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5, of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or in any group home housing 25 or more children and operating one or more additional sites under a central administration, with acceptable school structures at one or more centrally located sites to serve the single or composite populations of juvenile court school pupils detained therein in accordance with the provisions of Section 362, 727, or 730 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be known as juvenile court schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 929, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.2.

The county board of education shall provide for the administration and operation of juvenile court schools established pursuant to Section 48645.1:

(a) By the county superintendent of schools, provided that, in any county in which the board of supervisors is establishing or maintaining juvenile court schools on January 1, 1978, the county superintendent of schools may contract with the board of supervisors for the administration and operation of such schools if agreed upon between the board of education and the board of supervisors. In any event, the county superintendent of schools may contract with other educational agencies for supporting services to the same extent that school districts may contract with other such agencies.

(b) By contract with the respective governing boards of the elementary, high school, or unified school district in which the juvenile court school is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.3.

(a) Juvenile court schools shall be conducted in a manner as shall be prescribed by the county board of education to best accomplish the provisions of Section 48645. The minimum schoolday shall be 240 minutes. Minimum schooldays shall be calculated on the basis of the average number of minutes of attendance during not more than 10 consecutive days in which classes are conducted. The minimum schoolday for pupils in attendance in approved vocational education programs, work programs prescribed by the probation department pursuant to Section 883 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and work experience programs shall be 180 minutes, which shall be calculated on the basis of the average number of minutes of attendance during not more than 10
 consecutive days in which classes are conducted. The county board of education shall adopt
 and enforce a course of study and evaluate its program in accordance with Sections 51040, 51041, 51050, and 51054 and the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 51200) to Article 3 (commencing with Section 51220), inclusive, of Chapter 2 of Part 28, except subdivision (c) of Section 51220.

(b) Juvenile court schools shall not be closed on any weekday of the calendar year, except those weekdays adopted by the county board of education as school holidays or set aside by the county board of education for inservice purposes. However, the county board of education may close juvenile court schools when it deems the closing is necessary to accommodate contingencies.

(c) (1) The county board of education may adopt and enforce a course of study
 that enhances instruction in mathematics and English language arts for pupils attending juvenile court schools, as determined by statewide assessments or objective local evaluations and assessments as approved by the county superintendent of schools.

(2) The enhanced course of study adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall meet the standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8, as appropriate, and shall be tailored to meet the needs of the individual pupil to increase the pupil’s academic literacy and reading fluency.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that pupils in juvenile court schools have a rigorous curriculum that includes a course of study preparing them for high school graduation and career entry and fulfilling the requirements for admission to the University of California
 and the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.   (AB 1124)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.5.

(a) Each public school district and county office of education shall accept for credit full or partial coursework satisfactorily completed by a pupil while attending a public school, juvenile court school, or nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. The coursework shall be transferred by means of the standard state transcript. If a pupil completes the graduation requirements of the pupil’s school district of residence while being detained, the school district of residence shall issue to the pupil a diploma from the school the pupil last attended before detention or, in the alternative, the county superintendent of schools may issue the diploma.

(b) A pupil shall not be denied enrollment or
 readmission to a public school solely on the basis that the pupil has had contact with the juvenile justice system, including, but not limited to:

(1) Arrest.

(2) Adjudication by a juvenile court.

(3) Formal or informal supervision by a probation officer.

(4) Detention for any length of time in a juvenile facility or enrollment in a juvenile court school.

(c) Pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (f) of Section 48853.5, a pupil who has had contact with the juvenile justice system shall be immediately enrolled in a public school.

(d) (1) If a pupil transfers into a juvenile court school any time after the completion of the pupil’s second year of high school and completes the statewide coursework requirements for graduation specified in Section 51225.3 while attending a juvenile court school, and the pupil is in their third or fourth year of high school, the county office of education shall exempt the pupil from all coursework or other requirements of the county office of education that are in addition to the statewide coursework specified in Section 51225.3, unless the county office of education makes a finding that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the local graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school.

(2) To determine whether a juvenile court school pupil is in
 the third or fourth year of high school, the number of credits the pupil has earned to the date of transfer, the length of the pupil’s school enrollment, or, for pupils with significant gaps in school attendance, the pupil’s age as compared to the average age of pupils in the third or fourth year of high school, may be used, whichever will qualify the pupil for the exemption.

(3) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a pupil who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a juvenile court school for an enrollment period in the juvenile court school of at least 30 days, the county office of education shall notify the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil’s social worker and probation officer of the availability of the
 exemption and whether the pupil qualifies for the exemption. If the county office of education fails to provide timely notice pursuant to this section, the pupil shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification occurs after the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil, if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(4) The county office of education shall comply with all of the requirements of Section 48645.7.

(e) If a juvenile court school pupil is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section and completes the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3 before the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school and
 that pupil would otherwise be entitled to remain in attendance at the school, the county office of education shall not require or request that the pupil graduate before the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “local graduation requirements” means the coursework and other requirements for high school graduation adopted by the county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 703, Sec. 1.   (AB 2181)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.6.

Plans for any juvenile court school classrooms, offices, or any other school structures in any juvenile hall, juvenile home, day center, juvenile ranch, or juvenile camp shall be approved by the county board of education. Upon approval of the board of supervisors and the county board of education, the cost of such structures shall be a required charge against the funds of the county.

The cost of constructing or otherwise providing classrooms, offices, or other onsite school structures in group homes or other agencies housing children described in Sections 362, 727, and 730 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be the responsibility of the private agency. This contruction shall not entitle private agencies to an increase in the foster care reimbursement rates available from the State Department of Social Services or any other state agency. It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the county boards of education or the governing boards of school districts from entering into a contractual agreement providing compensation to group homes for the use of classrooms, offices, or other onsite school structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.7.

(a) When a juvenile court school pupil qualifies for an exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5, the county office of education shall notify the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil’s social worker and probation officer of all of the following:

(1) The availability of the exemption pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5.

(2) How any of the local graduation requirements that are waived may affect the pupil’s postsecondary education or vocation plans, including the ability to gain admission to an institution
 of higher education.

(3) Information about other opportunities available to the pupil, including, but not limited to, staying enrolled in high school beyond the fourth year, possible credit recovery, and any transfer opportunities available through the California Community Colleges.

(4) The pupil’s or the education rights holder’s, as applicable, option to allow the pupil to defer or decline the exemption and take additional coursework pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) or subdivision (c).
